California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) Specify that the board of supervisors shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the regional district. The provisions of this article pertaining to district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the regional district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the regional district.

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the proposed regional district. Notwithstanding Section 5502, the territory of the regional district need not be contiguous, need not include any city in the county, and need not consist of all unincorporated areas of San Bernardino County. No city or recreation and park district shall be included in the regional district unless requested by resolution of the governing body of the city or recreation and park district desiring to be included in the regional district.

(4) Describe the methods by which the district will be financed.

(5) Call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed regional district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed regional district shall be created and established. As used in this subdivision, “proposed regional district” includes the territory of any city or recreation and park district whose requesting resolution was adopted before the date of the hearing required by subdivision (a). Any city or recreation and park district that adopted a requesting resolution shall become a part of the regional district if a majority of the electors of the proposed regional district vote in favor of creating and establishing the regional district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1017, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.9.

(a) Proceedings for the formation of a regional park and open-space or regional open-space district with boundaries coterminous with those of Los Angeles County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and proceedings related to the petition as specified in this article. 

(b) For purposes of this section and Sections 5538.9 and 5539.9, “the regional district” means a district that contains all of the territory within
 Los Angeles County, including all incorporated cities. 

(c) The resolution described in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following: 

(1) Name the regional district and state the reasons for forming it. 

(2) Specify that the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the regional district. The provisions of this article pertaining to district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the regional district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the regional district. 

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the proposed regional district. 

(4) Describe the methods by
 which the district will be financed. 

(5) Specify that all revenue generated by the regional district, including the proceeds from the issuance of any bonds, shall be allocated among all affected public agencies within the district, for expenditure consistent with the purposes of this article, to adequately address the needs defined in Section 5539.9. For the purposes of this section, “all affected public agencies” means the County of Los Angeles, all incorporated cities within the county, and any regional state agency established for the purpose of acquiring land for park, recreation, open-space, and conservation purposes. 

(6) Call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed regional district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed regional district shall be created and established. 

(7) State that, in each of the first 20 years after the date an assessment is levied pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5539.9, a minimum of 80 percent of all proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district shall be used for capital outlay projects, including, but not limited to, acquisition and improvement of real property. For purposes of this subdivision, capital outlay projects include the servicing of bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.9. 

(8) Include an expenditure plan consisting of a list of capital outlay projects including acquisition areas and a general description of proposed outlays for operations and maintenance to be funded over a 20-year period of time from the date on which the assessment is first levied with proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district. 

(9) State the proposed rate and method of apportionment to be used in
 levying annual assessments for all categories of property. 

(10) Include any other matters determined to be necessary by the board of supervisors. 

(d) The regional district shall be created and established if a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote in favor of creating the district. 

(e) No proceeds from any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.9 shall be used for any operations, maintenance, or servicing purposes, except that bond proceeds may be used to pay all costs incidental to the preparation and issuance of the bonds. 

(f) Any funds generated by the district and used for maintenance and servicing shall be used only to maintain and service capital outlay projects funded pursuant to this section. Funds provided for maintenance and
 servicing shall be used to supplement existing levels of service and not to fund existing levels of service. 

(g) Assessments shall be levied not longer than the last maturity date of any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.9 and shall be levied not longer than 30 years from the date on which the assessment is first levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 823, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.10.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the population of Sacramento County continues to grow at an increasing rate, and already the county is far behind in providing adequate park, recreational, and open-space facilities for its residents. Formation of a regional district with boundaries coterminous with those of Sacramento County is critical to help address the growing and unmet park and recreational needs in Sacramento County.

(2) Proceedings for the formation of a regional park and open-space district or a regional open-space district with boundaries coterminous with those of Sacramento County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and proceedings related to the petition specified in this article.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Regional district” means a district formed pursuant to this section that contains all of the territory within Sacramento County, including all incorporated cities.

(2) “Capital outlay project” means the acquisition or improvement of real property, but, for purposes of subdivision (c) includes the
 servicing of bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.10.

(3) “Maintenance” means both of the following:

(A) Those purposes listed in Section 22531 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(B) Security for park, recreational, and open-space lands and improvements, including, but not limited to, park rangers and park security personnel.

(c) The resolution specified in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the proposed regional district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the regional district. The
 provisions of this article pertaining to district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the regional district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the regional district.

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the regional district.

(4) Describe the methods by which the regional district will be financed.

(5) (A) Specify that all revenue generated by the regional district, including the proceeds from the issuance of any bonds, shall be allocated among all affected public agencies within the territory of the district, for expenditure consistent with the purposes of this article, to adequately address the needs specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5539.10.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “all affected public agencies” means the County of Sacramento, all incorporated cities within the county, and any park district or county service area established for the purpose of acquiring, improving, and managing land or improvements for park, recreational, open-space, or conservation purposes which is included within the territory of the district.

(6) (A) Call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed regional district for the purpose of determining whether the regional district shall be formed.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of Sacramento shall prepare the language in the ballot label. The proposition shall specify the matters set forth in the resolution, except for subparagraph (A). The analysis and review of the measure shall be carried out
 pursuant to Section 9160 of the Elections Code.

(7) State that in the first 20 years after the date that an assessment is levied pursuant to Section 5539.10, a minimum of 75 percent of all proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district shall be used for capital outlay projects on a nonannualized basis.

(8) Include an expenditure plan consisting of a list of capital outlay projects, including acquisition areas, and a general description of proposed outlays for operation and maintenance to be funded, over a 20-year period from the date on which the assessment is first levied, with proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district. No funds shall be allocated for capital outlay projects or for the operation and maintenance of any lands or facilities that are not located within the boundaries of the regional district.

(9) State the proposed rate and method of apportionment to be used in levying annual assessments for all categories of property.

(10) Include any other matters determined to be necessary or desirable by the board of supervisors.

(d) (1) The formation of the regional district is not subject to Section 5517.1 or to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) The regional district shall be formed if a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote in favor of formation of the regional district.

(e) (1) No proceeds from any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.10 shall be expended for
 operation and maintenance. Bond proceeds may be expended to pay all costs incidental to the preparation and issuance of the bonds.

(2) The regional district may use the proceeds from the levy of assessments for the operation and maintenance of capital outlay projects and any lands acquired and improvements made to park, recreational, and open-space lands of the regional district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.11.

(a) A proceeding for the formation of a regional district in Santa Barbara County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Santa Barbara, adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and proceedings related to the petition as specified in this article.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the
 proposed regional district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the proposed regional district shall be governed by a board of five directors, to be elected in accordance with this article.

(3) Specify the territory to be included in the proposed regional district. The territory of the proposed regional district may include part of the territory within Santa Barbara County, and may include incorporated cities within that territory.

(4) Specify the boundaries of the five wards or subdistricts drawn pursuant to Section 5515.

(5) Specify that the regional district shall not have, and may not exercise, the power of eminent domain pursuant to Section 5542 or any other provision of law.

(6) Describe the methods by which the proposed regional district will be financed.

(7) Call, and give notice of, an election to be held in the proposed regional district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5514.

(8) Prescribe any other matters necessary to the formation of the proposed regional district.

(c) For purposes of this section, “regional district” means an open-space district formed pursuant to this section that contains part of the territory within Santa Barbara County, including all incorporated cities within that territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 755, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.12.

(a) A proceeding for the formation of a regional district in Ventura County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura, adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and related proceedings specified in this article.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the proposed regional district and
 state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the proposed regional district shall be governed by a board of five directors who shall be: (A) elected in accordance with this article; (B) appointed by the board of supervisors; or (C) the members of the board of supervisors acting ex officio. The method of selecting directors shall be determined by the terms of the regional district measure placed before the voters.

(3) Specify the territory to be included in the proposed regional district. The territory of the proposed regional district may include all or part of the territory within Ventura County, and may include incorporated cities within that territory.

(4) Specify the boundaries of the five wards or subdistricts drawn pursuant to Section 5515 or according to the boundaries of existing supervisorial
 districts.

(5) Specify that the regional district shall not have, and may not exercise, the power of eminent domain pursuant to Section 5542 or any other provision of law.

(6) Describe the methods by which the proposed regional district will be financed.

(7) Call, and give notice of, an election to be held in the proposed regional district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5514.

(8) Prescribe any other matters necessary to the formation of the proposed regional district.

(c) For purposes of this section, “regional district” means an open-space district formed pursuant to this section that contains all or part of the territory within Ventura County, and may include all incorporated
 cities within that territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.13.

(a) A proceeding for the formation of a regional district in the County of Solano may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Solano, adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and related proceedings specified in this article.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the proposed regional district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the Board of Supervisors of the County of Solano shall act, ex officio, as the governing body for the regional district, except as provided in
 paragraph (8). The provisions of this article pertaining to district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the regional district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the regional district, unless a separate board is elected pursuant to paragraph (8).

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the regional district.

(4) Describe the sources of funding that may be made available by the County of Solano upon formation of the regional district and describe any other methods by which the regional district will be financed.

(5) Specify that the district shall not have, and may not exercise, the power of eminent domain pursuant to Section 5542 or any other law.

(6) (A) Call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed regional district for the purpose of determining whether the regional district shall be formed. The election shall be consolidated with a statewide election or any election conducted throughout the County of Solano.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of Solano shall prepare the language in the ballot label. The proposition shall specify the matters set forth in the resolution, except for subparagraph (A). The analysis and review of the measure shall be carried out pursuant to Section 9160 of the Elections Code.

(7) Include any other matters necessary to the formation of the proposed regional district.

(8) Specify all of the following:

(A) No
 sooner than 10 years after formation of the regional district, the directors may, after holding a hearing, adopt a resolution placing the question of having an elected board of directors pursuant to Section 5527 on the ballot. Notice of the hearing on the resolution, specifying the time and place, shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district.

(B) If a majority of the voters voting upon the question are in favor, the regional district shall have an elected board of directors, with boundaries of the proposed wards or subdistricts being drawn pursuant to Section 5515. At the election, the voters shall also elect members to the regional district’s board of directors. Those persons shall take office only if a majority of the voters voting upon the question of having an elected board of directors are in favor of the question.

(C) If the question
 is submitted to the voters at a general district election, the notice required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the question to appear on the ballot. If the question is submitted to the voters at a special election, the notice of election and ballot shall contain a statement of the question.

(c) The resolution calling the election may provide for a single ballot measure or separate ballot measures on the question of the formation, the establishment of an appropriations limit authorized by Section 4 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, the authority to tax pursuant to Section 5566, and the authority to sell bonds pursuant to Section 5568, or any combination of those questions.

(d) (1) The formation of the regional district is not subject to Section 5517.1 or to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government
 Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) The district shall be formed if a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote in favor of formation of the regional district.

(e) If the regional district is created and established in the County of Solano, officers and employees of the County of Solano may act, ex officio or under contract, as officers and employees of the regional district and may discharge the authority and responsibility specified in the article.

(f) The County of Solano may provide the services and facilities needed to carry out the functions of the district. Proceeds of taxes levied by the district pursuant to Section 5566 may be used to reimburse the County of Solano for the actual costs of these services and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 216, Sec. 2.   (SB 365)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5507.

If the clerk’s certificate or certificates indicate that the petition has been properly signed, the board of supervisors of the county or counties not having the largest area within the proposed district shall, by resolution, fix a time and place for a hearing upon the question whether the territory described within the boundaries of its county will be benefited and should be included in the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5508.

Notice of the hearing, specifying the time and place, shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county conducting the hearing. The first publication shall be at least ten days before the day of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5509.

The hearing may be continued from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all. At the conclusion of the hearing the board of supervisors conducting it shall pass a resolution, either approving in whole or in part the inclusion within the proposed district of the territory within its county described in the petition, or disapproving it. If the board approves it in part only, it shall in the resolution describe the territory in its county the inclusion of which it approves. It shall then cause a certified copy of the resolution to be immediately transmitted to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed
 district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5510.

The board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district shall then, by resolution, fix a time and place for a hearing upon the question whether the petition should be granted and further proceedings taken under this article, and whether the property described in the petition will be benefited and should be included in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5511.

Notice of the hearing, specifying the time and place, shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county conducting the hearing. The first publication shall be at least ten days before the day of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5512.

The hearing may be continued from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of supervisors conducting it shall pass a resolution, either approving the petition in whole or in part, or denying it. If the board approves it in part only, it shall describe in the resolution the territory proposed to be included in the district. It shall not include in the description any territory, the inclusion of which has not been approved by the board of supervisors of the county in which it is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5512.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 5506.6, the question whether the district shall be named a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district shall be considered at the hearing conducted by the board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district. At the conclusion of such hearing, the board of supervisors shall pass a resolution naming the district.

(b) Except as provided in Section 5506.6, after formation of a district, the directors may change the name of the district, at the conclusion of a hearing held for
 that purpose, by resolution approved by four-fifths of the directors of the district. Notice of the hearing, specifying the time and place, shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district; or if there be none, in the county having the largest population within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5513.

Where all the territory described in the petition is located entirely within one county, the board of supervisors of that county shall, after the petition has been checked and certified by the clerk, proceed in the first instance as provided for the county having the largest area within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5514.

(a) The board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district shall, if the petition, after the hearing, has been approved, in whole or in part, have jurisdiction to proceed further with the calling of an election within the boundaries of the proposed district as described in the resolution passed at the conclusion of the hearing, and shall, either as a part of the same resolution or by a later resolution, call an election within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be
 created and established and, if necessary, for the purpose of electing the first board of directors therefor in case the district is created.

(b) In a district proposed to be formed pursuant to Section 5506.5, 5506.11, or 5506.12, the resolution calling the election may provide for a single ballot measure or separate ballot measures on the question of formation, establishment of an appropriations limit authorized by Section 4 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the authority to tax pursuant to Section 5566, and the authority to sell bonds pursuant to Section 5568, or any combination of those questions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 24, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5515.

Before calling the election the board of supervisors shall divide the proposed district into five or seven wards or subdistricts, the boundaries of which shall be so drawn that each contains approximately an equal number of electors.

The municipalities and any other territory included in the proposed district may be divided for the purpose of establishing the boundaries of the wards or subdistricts, if no election precinct is divided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

5516.

Upon establishing the wards the board of supervisors of the county shall give notice of an election to be held within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether it shall be created and established, and for the purpose of electing directors if established.

The notice shall state the name of the proposed district, and describe its boundaries. It shall also describe the boundaries of the wards or subdistricts provided for the purpose of electing directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.

The notice shall be published once a week for at least three weeks before the day of the election in each municipality in the proposed district. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in any of the municipalities included in the district, the notice shall be posted for at least three weeks in not less than three public places in each of such municipalities. If unincorporated territory is included in the district the notice shall be posted for a like period in at least three public places in the unincorporated territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer,
 within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual
 voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.4.

The elections officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following, in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the
 proposition, prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 164.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5518.

The ballots for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law, and in addition the following: Shall the (giving the name) district be created and established?YESNOThe ballots shall also contain the names of the persons nominated in each ward to serve as a member of the board of directors from the ward, showing separately each ward and its nominees. Any person may be nominated for the office of director upon written petition of 50 or more qualified electors of the ward or subdistrict in which the nominee resides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5519.

The election, including the nomination and election of directors and all matters not otherwise provided for by this article, shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in accordance with the general election laws of the State, as nearly as may be. No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he is a qualified elector of the territory included in the proposed district. The election may be held on the same day as and consolidated with any State, county, or city election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5520.

The election returns shall be forwarded to the board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district at the conclusion of the canvass, pursuant to Section 15372 of the Elections Code. At the next meeting after the receipt of the election returns, the board shall certify the results of the election. If a majority of those who have voted on the proposition vote in favor of the creation of the district the board of supervisors shall order and declare the district created.

If it appears from
 the canvass that a majority of the electors voting at the election have voted against the formation of the district, the proceedings fail entirely, and there shall be no similar proceedings instituted within that territory within six months from the date of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5521.

The board of supervisors shall also canvass the returns of the election with respect to the persons voted for as directors, and shall declare the persons receiving the highest number of votes, for each ward, respectively, to be duly elected as directors of the district, if they are residents and electors of the ward of the district as finally determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5522.

A person is not entitled to serve as a director unless he is a resident and elector of the district as finally determined, and any vacancies on the board of directors caused by the elimination of territory shall be filled by the remaining directors, in which case ward lines may be disregarded in making their appointments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5523.

The directors shall hold their respective offices only until the first Monday after the first day of January next following the first general election held at least 11 months after the election at which the district was formed, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5524.

The board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the district shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the district created and established, declaring the result of the election, and describing the boundaries of the district, to be recorded with the county recorder of each county in which any portion of the district is situated, and a certified copy shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. Thereupon the creation and establishment of the district is complete, and the persons elected as directors shall enter immediately upon their official duties after qualifying according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5525.

The board of supervisors calling the election shall make all provisions for holding the election throughout the entire proposed district.

The district shall pay the cost of the election, except that if it fails to be created and established, the county shall pay the cost of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1743.)
-------------------------------------------

5526.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any person, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of any district, and any proceedings in which the validity of the incorporation is attacked shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order described in section 5524 with the Secretary of State; otherwise, incorporation and the legal existence of the district is valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5526.1.

Any action or proceeding in a district formed pursuant to Section 5506.5, in Sonoma County, in which the validity of the imposition of any tax authorized by this article or the issuance of any bonds under this article or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any such action brought pursuant to Section 863 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be commenced within 180 days of the levy of the contested tax or the authorization of the bond sale. Otherwise, the taxes and
 bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of ordinances, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 186, Sec. 4.   Effective June 29, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5527.

The government of each district shall be vested in a board of five or seven directors, one from each of the wards or subdistricts, together with the other officers mentioned in this article. Directors shall be residents and electors of the wards or subdistricts from which they are nominated. Directors who are elected at any election which is held after October 1, 1965, shall be elected by ward or subdistrict and the qualified electors in any ward or subdistrict may only vote at a district election at which a director is to be elected to represent such ward or subdistrict and may only vote for one of the persons who is nominated for such office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1660.)
-------------------------------------------

5527.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5527, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single regional park district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the
 consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater